Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-9] Enforcement. (a) Arbitral
or other awards or settlements issued pursuant to this chapter by the center
shall be enforced by the circuit courts of this State as permitted by law and
consistent with the United States Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C. §201, et seq., and
the enforcement provisions of the Convention on the Recognition and Enforcement
of Foreign Arbitral Awards, as implemented by 9 U.S.C. §201, et seq., unless
subsection (b) below is applicable.

(b) Where the parties specifically submit to
jurisdiction of this chapter pursuant to section 658D-6, the center may require
those parties residing in countries not signatories to the Convention on the
Recognition and Enforcement of Foreign Arbitral Awards, as implemented by 9
U.S.C. §201, et seq., and not having sufficient assets otherwise within the
jurisdiction of the circuit courts of this State, to post such bonds or other
security as the center shall deem appropriate to ensure reasonable likelihood
of enforcement of any award or other relief ultimately ordered by the center in
the proceeding. [L 1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Revision Note

In subsection (b), "assure" changed to
"ensure" pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next